inc/flattened/phonology-only-syncope-rules.xfscript
! non-digraph relies on parens: [a (a)] ... is match greedy?
!for loans that don't syncopate (but may take morphology), consider writing vowels with special characters to escape syncope (or any other phonology that they need not take)
!could also translate loans into generic STEM+special char, then have loan word continuation lexica that spell out specific classes of loans by their phonological behavior

! important note (possibly): *sVh->sh != *sh for histo vowel deletion
define bound [%<|%>|%^|%*];
define sigma [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|c h|
                z (h)|s (h)|
                m|n|
                w|y|
                %'|h|
                a|i|o|e|
                a1| !a1>C -> a>C, a1>e1 -> >e, a1>a -> aa>, else: 0 (pl/obv not lengthened, dim quality not affected, otherwise, long a appears before suffixes, else: delete)
                i1| !i1> -> ii>, else: 0 (long i before all suffixes, else: delete) 
                i2| !i2 -> i (PA *i, trigger for palatalization)
                e1| !e1n[h|s|y] -> en[h|s|y], else: i (PA short *e, short for purposes of coalescence rule)
                o1| !behaves exactly like o is expected to act... where does it appear in morph output? -> not in nouns!
                w1| !w1[i|e1] -> o, (Odawa) w1a -> o, w1a -> wa, else: 0 (abstract w for PA labiovelars gw, kw, found in noun plurals) must be special char because velar-w clusters exist that do not undergo these rules (agwinde) (possibly could enforce morpheme boundary sensitivity if we wanted to get rid of w1 distinction)
                w2| !w2[n|#] -> 0, else: w (appears in nouns that synchronically end in i, form wag plurals)
                w3| !w3 -> 0 / C _, _C, _# (only surfaces in hiatus appears in negation)
                w4| !w4 surfaces pre-vocalically, sometimes as o (appears (primarily?) in cnj dub)
                w5| ![n|m]w5>a[n|g] -> [n|m]oa[n|g]->[n|m]oo[n|g], w5>goba -> >goba, else: w (VAI independent 3 infl)
                y1| !y1->0 (trigger for palatalization in participles, vowel raising in participles)
                s1| !s1->sh / _ i2
                m1| !m1->a / _ [m|n] (comp len in vti)
                n1| !n1->zh / _ i2 (appears in vtas)
                n2| !n2->0 / _ .#. (appears in inflectional morphemes)
                n3| !n3->0 / _ \.#. (appears after some negations)
                n4| !n4->n / (non comp len in vti)
                b1| !d1b1 -> p (cnj preterites)
                d1| !nd1 -> ng, d1b1 -> p, d1y1 -> j, else: d 
                d2| !deletable d in vii
                c1| !conjunct, negation linker (nasal-neg[s] -> nz, v-v -> vyv)
                X2| !'segment' to allow special phonology in ccnjs
                Va1| !Valen special char, instant remap: a lowered from o
                Vi1| !Valen special char, instant remap: a that in other dialects is i
                Vv1| !Valen special char, instant remap: unknown short vowel
                Vo1| !Valen special char, instant remap: o/wa variation
                Vo2| !Valen special char, instant remap: a that in other dialects is o, but is [e] in initial change (/o/ is [we] in initial change, /a/ is [e] in initial change)
                "PV/CCNJ+" !marks changed conjunct form
            ]; 
define cons [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|c h|
                z (h)|s (h)|
                m|n|
                w|y|
                %'|h|
                w1| 
                w2|
                w3|
                w4|
                w5|
                y1| 
                s1| 
                m1|
                n1| 
                n2| 
                n3| 
                n4| 
                b1|
                d1|
                d2
                !c1 !primary role is an inserted hiatus breaker. underlying presence w/ designation as consonant triggers vowel insertion rules (not desired)
            ]; 
define cseqs [[
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|c h|
                [z (h)]|[s (h) (p|t|k)]|
                [m (b)]|[n (d|[z (h)]|j|g|h|s|y|y1)]
               ](w)|
                h|%'|w|y|
                [g|k]w2|
                w1|w5|y1|s1|m1|n1|n2|n3|n4|b1|d1|d2
            ]; 
define codaseqs [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|[c h]|
                [z (h)]|[s (h) (p|t|k)]|
                [m (b)]|[n (d|[z (h)]|j|g|h|s|y)]|
                w|y|
                w1|w5|y1|m1|n1|n2|n3|n4|s1|b1|d1|d2
                ]; 
define longv [a a|e|i i|o o];
define shortv [a|i|o|e1]; !all other abstract vowels to [aio] by time relevant? should this bar following vowel, otherwise will match first grapheme of long vowel.
!define trushortv [a \[a]|i \[i]|o \[o]|e1]; !all other abstract vowels to [aio] by time relevant? should this bar following vowel, otherwise will match first grapheme of long vowel.
define shortvsurface [a|i|o]; 
define absv [a1|i1|i2|o1|e1];
define vowel [a (a)|i (i)|o (o)|e|a1|i1|i2|o1|e1];
define nastrig [n [h|y|s]];

define nas [n|n2|m|m1];  !should the other nasals be here (n4?)

!special y for raising a (-naan-ag -> naanig, -e1ny-ag-> enyig, -dy-ag (preterites) -> jig)

!remapping rule to purge valentine's special vowels
define rmvalent [
                    Va1 -> o ,
                    Vi1 -> a ,
                    Vv1 -> i ,
                    Vo1 -> w a ,
                    Vo2 -> a 
                ];

!####
!#rules that require morpheme boundary reference
!####
!{ morph bound
!{dependent stems 
define preGli [ o -> w || _ %< %^ vowel ]; ! prefix
define preDel [ shortv -> 0 || _ %< %^ vowel ]; ! prefix
!}
!{prefix adjustments
define optinitV [shortv (->) 0 || _ %< shortv cons ] ; !comment this rule for post-rhythmic syncope stage, could use trushortv
define preLen [ [..] -> o ||  %< _ o ]; ! prefix
define preEpen [ [..] ->  d || _ %< vowel ]; ! prefix
!}
define conPl [ shortv -> i || e1 n y %>  _ ]; !would be nice to have y1 here, but then it is the only y1 that doesn't delete

define a1toshort    [a1 %> a  ->  a %>] ;
define a1toe        [a1 %> e1  -> %> e] ;
define a1tolong     [a1 %>  ->  a a %>] ;
define i1tolong     [i1 %>  ->  i i %>] ;

define ordAssim     [nas -> m || _ %> b1 ,, !cnj prets have assim, no epenthesis
                    nas -> n ||
                                _ c1 %> [s|z|d|d1|j|g] , !cnj neg, else assim
                                _ %> k !VAI, VTI imperatives are only affixes beginning with k
                    ] ; 
define NC           [%> k -> g || n _ ] ; !VAI VTI imperatives [m|n]k -> ng
define cnjD1Gnasstem [ d1 -> g || nas c1 %>  _ ] ;
define partexcise   [ y1 -> 0 || d1 _ w4, d1 _ %> b1 ] ; !keep d1 next to special mode consonants so d1 -> g / _ w4 (cnjd1w4), d1b1 -> p (cnjD1p)
define cnjD1p       [d1 -> p || \[nas] _  %> b1 ]; !fortition for pret
define cnjpb1       [b1 -> 0 || p %>  _ ]; !cleaning up fortition
define cnjnegsig    [ [..] -> w4 || s i w3 %> d1 _ .#. ] ; !3Sg neg # -> sig *sid
define cnjd1w4      [ d1 -> g || _ w4 ] ; !d1 (third person) turns to g before dub
                                            !precedes w4 -> o, could d1 -> g || _ o/wwork?
!define cnj21dubw    [ [..] -> w || w4 %> a n g _ %> ] ; !close reading of Valentine 2001 shows 21pl dub has an extra w, Rand suspects this is an error.
define cnjoban      [   w -> o || [e|[a n]] g _ %> b1 ,, !2pl, 21pl w -> o (prt)
                        w4 -> o || _ %> b1 ]; !ditto for w4 (w4b1 only third person)
define cnjW3w       [w3 -> w || _ %> vowel] ; !w3 only appears in hiatus (why req morph bound?)
define cnjW3del     [w3 -> 0] ; !else: delete
define cnjrmbound   [ %> -> 0 ||  m _ b1, nas c1 _ z ]; !making sure no epenthesis in assim cases
define cnjaepen     [[..] -> a || nas c1 _ w4 , !a epen for nas-final
                                  nas c1 %>  _  g [w4|o] !d1w4 *= labiovelar gw?
                                  ] ; 
define w5o          [w5 -> o || nas _ %> a [n|g]] ; !feed oa->oo
define w5del          [w5 -> 0 || _ %> g o b a  ] ; !bleed ccEpen
define w5w          [w5 -> w] ; !doesn't require morph bound, but kept it here for contiguity with other w5 rules
define ccEpen [[..] -> i || cons _ %> cons , !these [i's] probably condition palatalization...
                            nas c1 _ %> nas ]; !workaround for conjunct order

define rmBound [[%>|%<|%^] -> 0]; 
!} end morph bound

!####
!#normal rules
!####

!##Conjunct order rules
define ccnjexcrspec [ [..] (->) i n || "PV/CCNJ+" _ d ] ; !this might be the obligatory way of doing excrescent nasals with d, if so, ccnjexcr must also change!!
define ccnjlong  [i i -> X2 a a, a a -> X2 y a a, e -> X2 y e, o o -> X2 w a a || "PV/CCNJ+" (cseqs) _ ] ; !changed forms, X2 is a blocker to stop changed short from getting fed by this rule
define ccnjshort [[i|a] -> X2 e, o -> X2 (w)e || "PV/CCNJ+" (cseqs) _ ] ; !changed forms
define ccnjexcr [[..] (->) n || X2 (w|y)[e|a a] _ d ,, [..] (->) m || X2 (w|y)[e|a a] _ b ] ; 
define rmccnj       [["PV/CCNJ+"|X2] -> 0] ;
define cnjHiatus    [c1 -> y || vowel _ vowel] ; !V-final hiatus
define cnjVoi       [s -> z  || nas c1 _ ] ; !nas-final negation
define d2k          [d2 c1 g -> k || _ .#. ] ; !d-final vii cnj 0sg ends in k, not dg 
define d2del        [d2 c1 -> 0 || _ s ] ; !d-final vii loses d before s
define d2d          [d2 -> d] ;
define cnjRmC1      [c1 -> 0] ; !no more use for special c1
define cnjD1Gnas    [d1 -> g || nas _ ]; !oft-duplicated d1->g change (envi mildly different above
define d1pal    [[d|d1] -> j || _ y1 vowel ]; !palatalization in participles, targets d now because -d `+3' in VTA 3C pattern does not fuse like d1 does, but it does palatalize
define cnjD1d       [d1 -> d]; !elsewhere d1
define cnjW4nas     [[..] -> h || w4 e n2 _ ]; !third person dub nasalization, Medler didn't do this
define cnjW4w       [w4 -> w || _ vowel]; !w4 non-o realization
define cnjw4Del     [w4 -> 0]; !elsewhere
define cnjb1b       [b1 -> b]; !assimilator b now b



!other rules
define vtiVoi [m1 s -> n z ] ; !nas-final negation (duplicating a little!)
define complen [m1 -> a || _ [m|n]] ;
define m1n      [m1 n4 -> n] ;
define n4n      [n4 -> n] ;
define m1m      [m1 -> m] ;
define w2nas [ w2 -> 0 || _ (vowel) [m|n|n2|n3]]; !not n1 (former lateral)
define w2def [ w2 -> w ];
define Spal [s1 -> s h || _ i2 ]; 
define Salv [s1 -> s];
define Npal [n1 -> z h || _ i2]; 
define i2def [i2 -> i];
define Nalv [n1 -> n]; 

define ny [[y|y1] -> h || n _ [%-|.#.]] ;

!define apocope [ [shortv] -> 0 ||  cons _ .#. ,, !cons specified because 'i' in 'ii' shouldn't delete
!                 [w|y|absv|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || _ .#.]; !these rules apply "at the same time"
!accounting for word-minimality
define apocope [ [shortv] -> 0 || [[shortv cseqs shortv ]|[longv (cseqs shortv)]] cseqs _ .#. ,, !cons specified because 'i' in 'ii' shouldn't delete
                 [w|y|absv|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || [[shortv cseqs shortv ]|[longv (cseqs shortv)]] (cseqs) _ .#.]; !these rules apply "at the same time"

define glidedel [[w|y|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || cons _ .#. ];

define n2del  [ n2 (->) 0 || _ .#. ]; !deleting n2s are strictly Odawa, variable in Medler
define n2def  [ n2 -> n];
define vvvDel [ shortv -> 0 // _ longv, longv _ ]; 

!I don't think it can be included with vCoal (but can't remember why)
!define Ecoal [e1 shortv -> e] ; 
! this saves contemptives/diminutives from getting aa:
!define bleedvCoal [a1 e1 -> e]; !obsolesced by a1toe

define y1Coal [y1 shortv -> i ];
define w1Coal [w1 [i|e1] -> o]; 
define w1Coal2 [w1 a -> o]; !only Odawa
define w1Faith [w1 a -> w a]; !other dialects
define w1Del [w1 -> 0]; 
!define nyCoal [shortv -> i || n y _ ];
define wiCoal [w i (->) o]; !Medler does this (could be more widespread, optional?)

!will need to apply vowel deletion over nasal
!giigoonhe1ns -> giigoons
!but not giigoonhag -> *giigoonhg (giigoonyag)
define vCoal [shortv -> o || [o|o1] _,, shortv -> i || [i|i1] _ ,,  shortv -> a || [a|a1] _ ];
